Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201185-1517
Board; power
to certify tax levy; limit; purpose; approval required to raise levy over
limit; how collected.

(1)(a) For fiscal years prior to fiscal
year 2010-11, the board may certify to the county board of equalization of
each county within the community college area a tax levy not to exceed the
maximum levy calculated pursuant to the Community College Foundation and Equalization
Aid Act on each one hundred dollars on the taxable valuation of all property
subject to the levy within the community college area, uniform throughout
such area, for the purpose of supporting operating expenditures of the community
college area.

(b) For fiscal year 2010-11 and each fiscal year thereafter, the board
may certify to the county board of equalization of each county within the
community college area a tax levy not to exceed ten and one-quarter cents
on each one hundred dollars on the taxable valuation of all property subject
to the levy within the community college area, uniform throughout the area,
for the purpose of supporting operating expenditures of the community college
area.

(2) In addition to the levies
provided in subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the
board may certify to the county board of equalization of each county within
the community college area a tax levy of not to exceed one cent on each one
hundred dollars on the taxable valuation of all property within the community
college area, uniform throughout such area, for the purpose of establishing
a capital improvement fund and bond sinking fund as provided in section 85-1515.
The levy provided by this subsection may be exceeded
by that amount necessary to retire the general obligation bonds assumed by
the community college area or issued pursuant to section 85-1515 according
to the terms of such bonds or for any obligation pursuant to section 85-1535
entered into prior to January 1, 1997.

(3) In addition to the levies
provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the board may also certify
to the county board of equalization of each county within the community college
area a tax levy on each one hundred dollars on the taxable valuation of all
property within the community college area, uniform throughout such area,
in the amount which will produce funds only in the amount necessary to pay
for funding accessibility barrier elimination project costs and abatement
of environmental hazards as such terms are defined in section 79-10,110. Such
tax levy shall not be so certified unless approved by an affirmative vote
of a majority of the board taken at a public meeting of the board following
notice and a hearing. The board shall give at least seven days' notice of
such public hearing and shall publish such notice once in a newspaper of general
circulation in the area to be affected by the increase.

(4) The taxes provided by
this section shall be levied and assessed in the same manner as other property
taxes and entered on the books of the county treasurer. The proceeds of the
tax, as collected, shall be remitted to the treasurer of the board not less
frequently than once each month.

Laws 1975, LB 344, § 15;

Laws 1978, LB 922, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 363, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 251;

Laws 1980, LB 599, § 16;

Laws 1980, LB 824, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 320, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 881, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 796, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 38, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 1050, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 197;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 35;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 79-2650;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 39;

Laws 1995, LB 268, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 32;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1084;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 69;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 72;

Laws 2005, LB 38, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB342, § 42;

Laws 2010, LB1072, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB59, § 6.
February 23, 2011
Community College Foundation and Equalization Aid Act, see section 85-2201.

Chapter 79, article 26, the Technical Community College Area Act, is not in violation of Article VIII, section 1A, of the Constitution. State ex rel. Western Technical Com. Col. Area v. Tallon, 196 Neb. 603, 244 N.W.2d 183 (1976).